Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1748.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 1, Chapter 106, O.S.L.


2024, as amended by Section 1, Chapter 342, O.S.L. 2025 (74 O.S.


Supp. 2025, Section 325.20), is amended to read as follows:


Section 325.20. A. All mobile food preparation vehicles


operating within this state prior to July 1, 2024, that are capable


of producing smoke or grease-laden vapors shall be in compliance


with the most current adopted fire code that was in effect at the


time of the most recent inspection of the mobile food preparation


vehicle. The vehicle shall remain in compliance with such fire code


for a period of ten (10) years from the date of the most recent


inspection. At the expiration of the ten-year period, a subsequent

Req. No. 2438 Page 1


inspection shall be based on the fire codes in effect at the time of


the inspection and such vehicle shall remain in compliance with such


code for a period of ten (10) years. With the exception of an


automatic fire extinguishing system, such requirement shall apply to


vehicles including, but not limited to, vehicles utilizing electric


energy, liquefied petroleum gas, compressed natural gas, or a


combination thereof for cooking, provided that portable fire


extinguishers are installed and maintained in accordance with the


most current version of National Fire Protection Association NFPA


10: Standard for Portable Fire Extinguishers. A six-liter Class K-


rated, portable fire extinguisher is required for all cooking


equipment involving solid fuels, vegetable or animal oils and fats,


or a combination thereof. All portable fire extinguishers shall be


in clear view and immediately available for use.


B. All mobile food preparation vehicles utilizing, handling, or


transporting liquefied petroleum gas or any liquefied petroleum gas


system, equipment, container, apparatus, or appliance shall receive


and maintain a permit from, and be inspected annually by, the


Oklahoma Liquefied Petroleum Gas Administration or its employees, in


conjunction with the State Fire Marshal issuing an annual operation


permit decal to mobile food preparation vehicles.


C. The provisions in subsection A of this section shall expire


on January 1, 2026, and all mobile food preparation vehicles shall



Req. No. 2438 Page 2


comply with the most current adopted fire codes set forth by this


state.


D. Mobile food preparation vehicles shall be under the


jurisdiction of the State Fire Marshal for fire and life safety code


compliance and shall be inspected annually by the State Fire Marshal


to ensure compliance with the latest applicable version of the


state-adopted minimum codes for fire and life safety as adopted by


the Oklahoma Uniform Building Code Commission. The State Fire


Marshal shall coordinate, at minimum, annual inspections conducted:


1. Within each of the four quadrants of this state; and


2. Twice within each county with a population exceeding four


hundred thousand (400,000) according to the latest Federal Decennial


Census.


E. D. Upon approval, the State Fire Marshal shall issue an


operational permit decal indicating that the vehicle meets the


minimum fire and life code requirements adopted at the time of


inspection.


F. E. Nothing in this section shall prevent:


1. The State Fire Marshal from enforcing the minimum fire code


requirements as allowed by law and revoking the operations of a


mobile food preparation vehicle for cause when such vehicle is


determined to be inherently dangerous to the health, safety, or


welfare of persons within this state;



Req. No. 2438 Page 3


2. A political subdivision from enforcing the event permits,


operational fees, land use regulations, zoning, or other ordinances


in relation to the operation of a mobile food preparation vehicle


within the boundaries of the political subdivision; or


3. The State Department of Health from licensing and regulating


mobile food preparation vehicles as provided by the provisions of


Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes and rules promulgated by the State


Commissioner of Health.


G. F. The State Fire Marshal may promulgate rules necessary to


implement the provisions of this section. Such rules shall have


uniform force and effect throughout this state and no political


subdivision or other agency shall enact or enforce any fire or life


safety code-related ordinances, rules, or other requirements for


mobile food preparation vehicles, except in a county with a


population exceeding four hundred thousand (400,000) according to


the latest Federal Decennial Census.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2438 CAD 1/14/2026 2:43:03 PM











Req. No. 2438 Page 4